District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

19-109

Recovery of dower obtained by default or collusion; damages.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 695, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 801(e), 48 DCR 2087
Mar 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 92(b), 53 DCR 6794

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 19-109.
1973 Ed., § 19-109.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-191, in the section credit for D.C. Law 13-292, validated a previously made technical correction.